Mississippi statutes. Title 17. Local Government; Provisions Common to Counties and Municipalities
Chapter 19. Appropriations to Planning and Development Districts

§ 17-19-1.
Appropriations to planning and development districts.

The board of supervisors of each county and the governing authorities of each municipality in the state are authorized and empowered, in their discretion, to appropriate and pay such sums as they deem necessary and desirable, out of any available funds of the county or municipality which are not required for any other purpose, to the planning and development district in which the county or municipality is located.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1981, ch. 349, § 1, eff from and after October 1, 1981.